Washington statutes.
RCW 7.24.090

Determination of issues of fact.

When a proceeding under this chapter involves the determination of an issue of fact, such issue may be tried and determined in the same manner as issues of fact are tried and determined in other civil actions, in the court in which the proceeding is pending.

[ 1935 c 113 s 9; RRS s 784-9.]